Hawaii statutes.
§467E-7.5 Reciprocity and endorsement. (a)
The director may enter into reciprocity agreements with other states and issue
a license to a social worker who has been licensed in that state; provided that
the requirements for a license in the state in which the applicant is licensed
are deemed by the director to be equal to or greater than the current
requirements for a license in this State.

(b) The director may also issue a license by
endorsement by honoring a passing score on the examination of the Association
of Social Work Boards; provided that at a minimum, the applicant meets the
other requirements under sections 467E-7 and 467E-9, and the passing score is
from the examination category that is required for licensure in this State and
the other state uses for its license. [L 2000, c 225, §1; am L 2002, c 167,
§12]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next